netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wanAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wanAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wanAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="XA1"><par n="at_a"/><i>XA</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="mI2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_I_A"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="hnu1"><par n="at_a"/><i>hn</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="XU1"><par n="at_a"/><i>X</i><par n="mr_U_o"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="wQ1"><par n="at_a"/><i>w</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="pQ1"><par n="at_a"/><i>p</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="Gq2"><par n="at_a"/><i>G</i><par n="mr_q_Ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="JQ1"><par n="at_a"/><i>J</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="vq1"><par n="at_a"/><i>v</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ1"><par n="at_a"/><i>g</i><par n="mr_Q_al"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="kq3"><i>kq</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kq3"><i>k</i><par n="mr_q_Ar"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="swQ1"><i>sw</i><par n="mr_Q_Ir"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kQ2"><i>k</i><par n="mr_Q_Ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="hul1"><par n="at_a"/><i>h</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>l</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="ruh1"><par n="at_a"/><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="yaB1"><par n="at_a"/><i>ya</i><par n="mr_B_p"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="mqj2"><par n="at_a"/><i>m</i><par n="mr_q_Ar"/><i>j</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvap1"><par n="at_a"/><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>vap</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="Nij2"><par n="at_a"/><par n="mr_N_n"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_j_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="mqR2"><par n="at_a"/><i>m</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>R</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="xuR1"><par n="at_a"/><i>x</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="kRam3"><par n="at_a"/><i>kRa</i><par n="mr_m_M"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_xivAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="RAX1"><par n="at_a"/><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>A</i><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="aS1"><par n="at_a_A"/><i>S</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_svAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="kad3"><par n="at_a"/><i>kad</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="vix3"><par n="at_a"/><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="kqw2"><i>kqw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="anj1"><i>a</i><par n="mr_nj_fk"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="anj1"><par n="at_a_A"/><par n="mr_nj_fk"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="man2"><i>man</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wanAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="viR3"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="pruR2"><i>pr</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>R</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="grah1"><i>grah</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_IR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="rah3"><i>ra</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>h</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="rah3"><i>ra</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>h</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="ruj2"><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>j</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="yuj3"><i>y</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>j</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
